Rhode Island statutes. Title 37 Public Property and Works
Chapter 12.1 Substitution of Security for Retained Earnings of Architects and Engineers

37-12.1-1.
Definitions.

Terms used in this chapter shall be construed as follows:

“Designers” means any person, firm, or corporation duly authorized pursuant to the laws of this state to engage in the practice of architecture and/or engineering within this state.

“Public works contract” means a contract to perform design or planning services by a designer with the state, any agency, or governmental subdivisions thereof.

“Retained earnings” means any money or earned estimates withheld from a designer pursuant to the terms of a public works contract.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 161, § 1.

37-12.1-2.
Substitution of security for retained earnings by designers.

Where any public works contract provides for the holding of retained earnings from a designer, the designer may from time to time withdraw the whole or any portion of the amount retained upon either depositing with the general treasurer:

United States treasury bonds, United States treasury notes, United States treasury certificates of indebtedness, or United States treasury bills;

Bonds or notes of the state of Rhode Island; or

Bonds of any political subdivision of the state of Rhode Island.

With respect to the deposit of securities, the general treasurer shall, on a regular basis, collect all interest or income on the securities so deposited and shall pay the interest or income when and as collected to the designer depositing the securities. If the security is in the form of coupon bonds, the general treasurer shall deliver each coupon as it matures to the designer.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 161, § 1.

37-12.1-3.
Deduction from retained earnings.

In the event that pursuant to the terms of the public works contract it is necessary to deduct any sum from retained earnings, the state or governmental unit or agency thereof shall first apply the deduction against sums not withdrawn and thereafter from the proceeds of the sale of any securities deposited or from the income earned on those securities, whichever is applicable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 161, § 1.

37-12.1-4.
Endorsement on securities.

All securities deposited with the general treasurer pursuant to this chapter shall be properly endorsed by the designer in such manner as to enable the general treasurer to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 161, § 1.

37-12.1-5.
Applicability.

This chapter shall apply to all retained earnings held pursuant to any public works contract as of June 16, 1991.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 161, § 1.